src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUPPELOGIS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          nuppe:nuppe#    LOHKAI-END ;
       goalmmát:goalmmát# LOHKAI-END ;
       njealját:njealját# LOHKAI-END ;
          viđát:viđát#    LOHKAI-END ;
 viđát+Err/Orth:vidát#    LOHKAI-END ;
          guđát:guđát#    LOHKAI-END ;
 guđát+Err/Orth:gudát#    LOHKAI-END ;
          viđat:viđat#    LOHKAI-END ;
 viđat+Err/Orth:vidat#    LOHKAI-END ;
          guđat:guđat#    LOHKAI-END ;
 guđat+Err/Orth:gudat#    LOHKAI-END ;
        čihččet:čihččet#  LOHKAI-END ;
        gávccát:gávccát#  LOHKAI-END ;
         ovccát:ovccát#   LOHKAI-END ;
          logát:logát#    LOHKAI-END ;


LEXICON LOHKAI-END   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
       logis:lohºkis OVCCIS_N ;
 logát+A+Ord:logád   VUOSTTAS ;

LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! arabic as first part,
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-»»# NAMATCont ; ! 10-jienat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
 +Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:∑-»»# SASCont   ; !6-jahkásaš
        +Use/NG:      RHyph     ; ! 3-


LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS !!≈ * **@CODE@**: numeral as first part: duhatjienat,
                         !!  logigielat, etc.
          NAMAT ; ! duhatjienat, logigielat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                 ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                 ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
          SAS   ; !viđajahkásaš
 +Use/NG: RHyph ; ! golmma-

LEXICON SAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** gives :»»» and goes to SASCont
 +Cmp#:»»# SASCont ;

LEXICON NOM-COMPOUNDS != * __@CODE@__ logijahki, čuohtejahki
 +Cmp#:»»# NOM-COMPOUNDSCont ;


LEXICON NOM-COMPOUNDSCont != * __@CODE@__ logijahki
       jahki+N+Sem/Time:jahºki     ALBMI    ; !logijahki
   proseanta+N+Sem/Part:proseanºta GOAHTI-A ;
       kilo+N+Sem/Measr:kilo       ARENA    ;
 salla+N+Sem/Body_Measr:salla      BEARRI   ;


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON num-ordinal   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Ordinal numbers
  num-ordinal-1    ;
  num-ordinal-2to9 ;

LEXICON num-ordinal-1   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Ordinal numbers vuosttas, vuosttaš
              vuosttas+A+Ord:vuosttas   VUOSTTAS       ;
              vuosttaš+A+Ord:vuosttaž   VUOSTTAS       ;
     vuosttaš+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuosttaš   GAHPIR_CGforms ;
 vuosttaš+A+Ord+Ess+Err/Orth:vuosttašin K              ;
     vuosttaš+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuostaž    VUOSTTAS       ;
     vuosttaš+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuostáž    VUOSTTAS       ;
     vuosttas+A+Ord+Err/Orth:vuosttás   VUOSTTAS       ;
 vuosttaš+A+Ord+Err/Orth-a-á:vuosttáž   VUOSTTAS       ;

LEXICON num-ordinal-2to9   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Ordinal numbers, 2 to 20, even though the name implies differenty
                      nubbi+A+Ord:nubbi%>              nubbicase ;
          nubbi+A+Ord+Attr+Use/NG:nubbe                K         ;
            nubbi+A+Ord+Cmp/SgNom:nubbi                R         ;
            nubbi+A+Ord+Cmp/SgNom:nubbe                R         ;
                   goalmmát+A+Ord:goalmmád             VUOSTTAS  ;
      goalmmát+A+Ord+Err/Orth-a-á:goalmmad             VUOSTTAS  ;
                   njealját+A+Ord:njealjád             VUOSTTAS  ;
      njealját+A+Ord+Err/Orth-a-á:njealjad             VUOSTTAS  ;
          njealját+A+Ord+Err/Orth:njealljád            VUOSTTAS  ;
          njealját+A+Ord+Err/Orth:njealjjád            VUOSTTAS  ;
                      viđát+A+Ord:viđád                VUOSTTAS  ;
                      guđát+A+Ord:guđád                VUOSTTAS  ;
                      viđat+A+Ord:viđad                VUOSTTAS  ;
                      guđat+A+Ord:guđad                VUOSTTAS  ;
                    čihččet+A+Ord:čihččed              VUOSTTAS  ;
                    gihččet+A+Ord:gihččed              VUOSTTAS  ;
                    gávccát+A+Ord:gávccád              VUOSTTAS  ;
                     ovccát+A+Ord:ovccád               VUOSTTAS  ;
             oktanuppelogát+A+Ord:okta#nuppe#logád     VUOSTTAS  ;
           guoktenuppelogát+A+Ord:guokte#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
           golbmanuppelogát+A+Ord:golbma#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
         njealljenuppelogát+A+Ord:njeallje#nuppe#logád VUOSTTAS  ;
           vihttanuppelogát+A+Ord:vihtta#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
           guhttanuppelogát+A+Ord:guhtta#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
            čiežanuppelogát+A+Ord:čieža#nuppe#logád    VUOSTTAS  ;
           gávccinuppelogát+A+Ord:gávcci#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
  gávccinuppelogát+A+Ord+Err/Orth:gávcce#nuppe#logád   VUOSTTAS  ;
            ovccinuppelogát+A+Ord:ovcci#nuppe#logád    VUOSTTAS  ;
   ovccinuppelogát+A+Ord+Err/Orth:ovcce#nuppe#logád    VUOSTTAS  ;
                guoktelogát+A+Ord:guokte#logád         VUOSTTAS  ;
       guoktelogát+A+Ord+Err/Orth:guovtte#logád        VUOSTTAS  ;

!                     logát+A+Ord:logád                VUOSTTAS  ;
!                    čuođát+A+Ord:čuođád               VUOSTTAS  ;
!                   duháhat+A+Ord:duháh                VUOSTTAS  ;
!              millijovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag         VUOSTTAS  ;
!                  miljonat+A+Ord:miljonag             VUOSTTAS  ;

LEXICON VUOSTTAS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          :%>   GAPPUS0 ;
   +Sg+Nom:     K       ;
 +Cmp/Attr:     R       ;
      +Ess:in   K       ;
      +Ess:in%> NPxC    ;
          :%>   MALLAS- ;
     +Attr:     K       ;

! Collective numerals
! ---------------

LEXICON num-collective   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Collective numerals
!                                 ovttas:okºtas     OVCCIS_N       ; !trur ikke denne eksisterer
                                guovttis:guo        GUOVTTIS_N     ;
                                 golmmas:golbmas    OVCCIS_N       ;
                                njealjis:njealljis  OVCCIS_N       ;
  njealjis+N+Coll+Sem/Group_Hum+Err/Orth:njealjis   GAHPIR_CGforms ;
                                   viđas:vi         VIDAS_N        ;
                                   guđas:gu         VIDAS_N        ;
                         čiežas+Dial/-GG:čiehččas%> CIEZAS_N       ;
                         čiežas+Dial/-KJ:čiehºčas   OVCCIS_N       ;
                                  giežas:giehºčas   OVCCIS_N       ;
                                 gávccis:gákºcis    OVCCIS_N       ;
                                  ovccis:okºcis     OVCCIS_N       ;




! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

LEXICON ONLY_OKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          okta+Num+Sg+Nom:okºta          K_not_ge         ;
             okta+Num+Ess:okºta%>n       K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Acc:okºta%>X4      K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Gen:okºta%>X4      K_not_ge         ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:okºta%>X4      K_not_ge         ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:okºta%>X4      K_not_ge         ;
       okta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:okºta»X4       NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
          okta+Num+Sg+Loc:okºta%>X4s     K_not_ge         ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:okºta%>X4n     K_not_ge         ; ! !SOUTH
          okta+Num+Pl+Nom:okºta%>X4t     K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Ill:okºta%>X3j     K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Com:okºta%>X5jn    K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Acc:okºta%>X5jd    K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:okºta%>X5jd    K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:okºta%>X5jd    RHyph            ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:okºta%>X5jd    K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Ill:okºta%>X5jde   K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Loc:okºta%>X5jn    K_not_ge         ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:okºta%>X5jd    K_not_ge         ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Com:okºta%>X5jgujn K                ;
          akta+Num+Sg+Nom:akºta          K_not_ge         ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                            golbma:golbma#               NUPPELOGIS           ;
                          njeallja:njeallja#             NUPPELOGIS           ;
                            guhtta:guhtta#               NUPPELOGIS           ;
                             gieža:gieža#                NUPPELOGIS           ;
LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   golbmalogi:golbma#logi#   num-ordinal        ;
 njealljelogi:njeallje#logi# num-ordinal        ;
 njealljalogi:njeallja#logi# num-ordinal        ;
   vihttalogi:vihtta#logi#   num-ordinal        ;
   guhttalogi:guhtta#logi#   num-ordinal        ;
    čiežalogi:čieža#logi#    num-ordinal        ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci#logi#   num-ordinal        ;
   golbmalogi:golbma#logi#   num-collective     ;
 njealljelogi:njeallje#logi# num-collective     ;
 njealljalogi:njeallja#logi# num-collective     ;
   vihttalogi:vihtta#logi#   num-collective     ;
   guhttalogi:guhtta#logi#   num-collective     ;
    čiežalogi:čieža#logi#    num-collective     ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci#logi#   num-collective     ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 guokte:guokte#   NUPPELOGIS           ;
                 vihtta:vihtta#   NUPPELOGIS           ;
                 gávcci:gávcci#   NUPPELOGIS           ;
LEXICON CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                čuođinjeallje:čuođinjeallje#        LOHKAI-END       ;
                  čuođiguhtta:čuođiguhtta#          LOHKAI-END       ;
                   čuođiovcci:čuođiovcci#           LOHKAI-END       ;
             oktačuohtivihtta:okta#čuohti#vihtta#   LOHKAI-END       ;
             oktačuohtigávcci:okta#čuohti#gávcci#   LOHKAI-END       ;
         čuohti+Num+Cmp/SgGen:čuohti                NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
               čuohtinjeallje:čuohtinjeallje#       LOHKAI-END       ;
                  čuohtigieža:čuohtigieža#          LOHKAI-END       ;
         čuohti+Num+Cmp/SgNom:čuohte                NOM-COMPOUNDS    ;
LEXICON num-imprecise   !!≈ * **@CODE@** Imprecise numbers
                                            gallát+A+Ord:gallád                                     VUOSTTAS              ;
                               gallát+A+Ord+Err/Orth-a-á:gallad                                     VUOSTTAS              ;
                                 máŋgalogi+Num+Cmp/SgGen:máŋgga#lot                                 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ;
                        máŋgalogi+Num+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:máŋggaloht                                 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ; !
                                 moaddelogi+Num+Err/Orth:moatti#lot                                 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ; ! !Dialect
                                moaddelogi+Num+Cmp/SgGen:moatte#loh                                 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ;
                                moaddelogi+Num+Cmp/SgGen:moatte#logi                                NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ;
                              gallelogi+v2+Num+Cmp/SgGen:galle#loh                                  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS      ;
                                        bealnjealját+Num:beal#njealjád                              VUOSTTAS              ;
                                           bealviđat+Num:beal#viđad                                 VUOSTTAS              ;
                                           bealguđát+Num:beal#guđád                                 VUOSTTAS              ;
                                         bealgihččet+Num:beal#gihččed                               VUOSTTAS              ;
                                          bealovccát+Num:beal#ovccád                                VUOSTTAS              ;
                                        bealnut+Num+Attr:beal#nut                                   SAS                   ;
                                 bealgoalmmát+A+Ord+Attr:beal#goalmmát                              SAS                   ;
                                 bealnjealját+A+Ord+Attr:beal#njealját                              SAS                   ;
                                    bealviđát+A+Ord+Attr:beal#viđát                                 SAS                   ;
                                  bealčihččet+A+Ord+Attr:beal#čihččet                               SAS                   ;
                                  bealgávccát+A+Ord+Attr:beal#gávccát                               SAS                   ;
                                    beallogát+A+Ord+Attr:beal#logát                                 SAS                   ;
